BinarySearchTree/dictionaries/en_US.aff
# 2024-01-29 (Marco A.G.Pinto)
# - Fix: apostrophe handling, by adding: WORDCHARS 0123456789’ to the .aff.
#

SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
ICONV 1
ICONV ’ '
NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE n*1t
COMPOUNDRULE n*mp
WORDCHARS 0123456789’

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

PFX I Y 1
PFX I   0     in         .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un         .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     de          .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     dis         .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F   0     con         .

PFX K Y 1
PFX K   0     pro         .

SFX V N 2
SFX V   e     ive        e
SFX V   0     ive        [^e]

SFX N Y 3
SFX N   e     ion        e
SFX N   y     ication    y 
SFX N   0     en         [^ey] 

SFX X Y 3
SFX X   e     ions       e
SFX X   y     ications   y
SFX X   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX H N 2
SFX H   y     ieth       y
SFX 
